Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1722
Request for qualifications; prequalify design-builders; publication in newspaper; short list.

(1) The commission shall prepare a request for qualifications for design-build proposals and shall prequalify design-builders. The request for qualifications shall describe the project in sufficient detail to permit a design-builder to respond. The request for qualifications shall identify the maximum number of design-builders the commission will place on a short list as qualified and eligible to receive a request for proposals.

(2) A person or organization hired by the commission under section 37-1719 shall be ineligible to compete for a design-build contract on the same project for which the person or organization was hired.

(3) The request for qualifications shall be (a) published in a newspaper of statewide circulation at least thirty days prior to the deadline for receiving the request for qualifications and (b) sent by first-class mail to any design-builder upon request.

(4) The commission shall create a short list of qualified and eligible design-builders in accordance with the guidelines adopted pursuant to section 37-1720. The commission shall select at least two prospective design-builders, except that if only one design-builder has responded to the request for qualifications, the commission may, in its discretion, proceed or cancel the procurement. The request for proposals shall be sent only to the design-builders placed on the short list.

Laws 2018, LB775, § 23.